Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 7. EARLY VOTING

SUBTITLE A. EARLY VOTING

CHAPTER 87. PROCESSING EARLY VOTING RESULTS

SUBCHAPTER A. EARLY VOTING BALLOT BOARD

Sec. 87.001. BOARD CREATED; JURISDICTION. An early voting ballot board shall be created in each election to process early voting results from the territory served by the early voting clerk.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.14; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 87.002. COMPOSITION OF BOARD. (a) The early voting ballot board consists of a presiding judge, an alternate presiding judge, and at least one other member.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (d), the presiding judge and the alternate presiding judge are appointed in the same manner as a presiding election judge and alternate presiding election judge, respectively. Except as provided by Subsection (c), each other member is appointed by the presiding judge in the same manner as the precinct election clerks.

(c) In the general election for state and county officers, each county chair of a political party with nominees on the general election ballot shall submit to the county election board a list of names of persons eligible to serve on the early voting ballot board in order of the county chair's preference. The county election board shall appoint at least one person from each list to serve as a member of the early voting ballot board. The same number of members must be appointed from each list. The county election board shall appoint persons as members of the early voting ballot board in the order of preference indicated on each list.

(d) In addition to the members appointed under Subsection (c), the county election board shall appoint as the presiding judge the highest-ranked person on the list provided under that subsection by the political party whose nominee for governor received the most votes in the county in the most recent gubernatorial general election and as the alternate presiding judge the highest-ranked person on the list provided under that subsection by the political party whose nominee for governor received the second most votes in the county in the most recent gubernatorial general election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.14; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 3.14, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 87.003. ELIGIBILITY FOR BOARD MEMBERSHIP. To be eligible for appointment to the early voting ballot board, a person must meet the requirements for eligibility for service as a presiding election judge, except that the appointee must be a qualified voter of the territory served by the early voting clerk and is not required to be a qualified voter of any other particular territory.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.14; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 87.0031. TRAINING. The secretary of state shall provide a standardized training program and materials for members of an early voting ballot board in the same manner it provides such a program under Subchapter F, Chapter 32.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 415 (H.B. 1632), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 87.004. BOARD COMPOSED OF PRECINCT ELECTION OFFICERS. In an election other than the general election for state and county officers or a primary election, the authority ordering the election may direct by resolution, order, or other official action that the precinct election officers serving one of the election precincts also serve as the early voting ballot board for the election. In that case, the presiding election judge of the precinct serves as the board's presiding officer.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.14; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 87.005. COMPENSATION OF MEMBERS. (a) Members of the early voting ballot board are entitled to the same compensation as presiding election judges, except that:

(1) the presiding judge may be compensated at a higher rate at the discretion of the appropriate authority; and

(2) if the board concludes its work in less than 10 hours, the members may be paid greater compensation than that regularly payable for the amount of time worked, but not to exceed the amount payable for 10 hours' work.

(b) Precinct officers serving as board members under Section 87.004 may not be compensated for both positions.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.14; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 438 (S.B. 1418), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 87.006. EARLY VOTING BALLOT BOARD MEMBERS: OATH AND IDENTIFICATION. (a) A member of the early voting ballot board shall repeat the following oath aloud:

"I swear (or affirm) that I will objectively work to be sure every eligible voter's vote is accepted and counted, and that only the ballots of those voters who violated the Texas Election Code will be rejected. I will make every effort to correctly reflect the voter's intent when it can be clearly determined. I will not work alone when ballots are present and will work only in the presence of a member of a political party different from my own. I will faithfully perform my duty as an officer of the election and guard the purity of the election."

(b) A member of the early voting ballot board who arrives after the oath is made shall repeat the oath aloud before performing any duties as a member.

(c) Following administration of the oath, each member of the early voting ballot board shall be issued a form of identification, prescribed by the secretary of state, to be displayed by the member during the member's hours of service on the board.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. DELIVERING MATERIALS TO BOARD

Sec. 87.021. BALLOTS AND OTHER MATERIALS DELIVERED TO BOARD. The early voting clerk shall deliver to the early voting ballot board:

(1) in an election in which regular paper ballots are used for early voting by personal appearance, each ballot box, in accordance with Section 85.032(b), containing the early voting ballots voted by personal appearance and the clerk's key to each box;

(2) the jacket envelopes containing the early voting ballots voted by mail, regardless of the ballot type or voting system used;

(3) the poll lists prepared in connection with early voting by personal appearance;

(4) the list of registered voters used in conducting early voting; and

(5) a ballot transmittal form that includes a statement of the number of early voting ballots voted by mail, regardless of the ballot type or voting system used, that are delivered to the early voting ballot board, and in an election in which regular paper ballots are used for early voting by personal appearance, the number of names appearing on the poll lists prepared in connection with early voting by personal appearance.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 562, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.21; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1164 (H.B. 2817), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 87.0211. ELECTRONIC DELIVERY OF MATERIALS RECORDED ELECTRONICALLY. If ballot materials and ballot applications are recorded electronically as provided by Section 87.126, the early voting clerk may deliver those materials to the early voting ballot board through electronic means.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1164 (H.B. 2817), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 87.022. TIME OF DELIVERY: GENERAL RULE. Except as provided by Section 87.0221, 87.0222, 87.023, or 87.024, the materials shall be delivered to the early voting ballot board under this subchapter during the time the polls are open on election day, or as soon after the polls close as practicable, at the time or times specified by the presiding judge of the board.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.22; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 88 (S.B. 895), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 87.0221. TIME OF DELIVERY: PAPER BALLOTS. (a) In an election in which regular paper ballots are used for early voting by personal appearance or by mail, the materials may be delivered to the board between the end of the period for early voting by personal appearance and the closing of the polls on election day, or as soon after closing as practicable, at the time or times specified by the presiding judge of the board.

(b) The early voting clerk shall post notice of each delivery of materials under this section that is to be made before the time for opening the polls on election day. The notice shall be posted at the main early voting polling place continuously for at least 24 hours immediately preceding the delivery.

(c) At least 24 hours before each delivery, the early voting clerk shall notify the county chair of each political party having a nominee on the ballot of the time the delivery is to be made.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.23. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 78, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1164 (H.B. 2817), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 87.0222. TIME OF DELIVERY: BALLOTS VOTED BY MAIL. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (a-1), not later than the ninth day before election day, the jacket envelopes containing early voting ballots voted by mail shall be delivered to the board.

(a-1) Any jacket envelopes of early voting ballots voted by mail returned after delivery of the ballots under Subsection (a) may be delivered to the presiding judge of the early voting ballot board between the end of the ninth day before election day and the closing of the polls on election day, or as soon after closing as practicable, at the time or times specified by the presiding judge.

(b) The early voting clerk shall post notice of each delivery of balloting materials under this section that is to be made before the time for opening the polls on election day. The notice shall be posted at the main early voting polling place continuously for at least 24 hours immediately preceding the delivery.

(c) At least 24 hours before each delivery made before the time for opening the polls on election day, the early voting clerk shall notify the county chair of each political party having a nominee on the ballot of the time the delivery is to be made.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 88 (S.B. 895), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 238 (S.B. 383), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 62, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1167 (S.B. 1599), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 87.0223. TIME OF DELIVERY: BALLOTS SENT OUT BY REGULAR MAIL AND E-MAIL. (a) If the early voting clerk has provided a voter a ballot to be voted by mail by both regular mail and e-mail under Subchapter C, Chapter 101, the clerk may not deliver a jacket envelope containing the early voting ballot voted by mail by the voter to the board until:

(1) both ballots are returned; or

(2) the deadline for returning marked ballots under Section 86.007 has passed.

(b) If both the ballot provided by regular mail and the ballot provided by e-mail are returned before the deadline, the early voting clerk shall deliver only the jacket envelope containing the ballot provided by e-mail to the board. The ballot provided by regular mail is considered to be a ballot not timely returned.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1318 (S.B. 100), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 87.023. TIME OF DELIVERY: AUTOMATICALLY COUNTED BALLOTS. (a) In an election in which early voting ballots are to be counted by automatic tabulating equipment at a central counting station, the ballots voted by mail to be automatically counted may be delivered to the board between the end of the period for early voting by personal appearance and the closing of the polls on election day, or as soon after closing as practicable, at intervals specified by the presiding judge of the board.

(b) The early voting clerk shall post notice of each delivery of ballots under this section that is to be made before the time for opening the polls on election day. The notice shall be posted at the main early voting polling place continuously for at least 24 hours immediately preceding the delivery.

(c) At least 24 hours before the first delivery of ballots covered by Subsection (b), the early voting clerk shall notify the county chair of each political party having a nominee on the ballot of the time the first delivery is to be made.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.15; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 79, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1164 (H.B. 2817), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 87.024. TIME OF DELIVERY: VOTING MACHINE ELECTION. (a) In an election in which early voting votes by personal appearance are cast on voting machines, the jacket envelopes containing the early voting ballots voted by mail may be delivered to the board between the end of the period for early voting by personal appearance and the closing of the polls on election day, or as soon after closing as practicable, at a time specified by the presiding judge of the board.

(b) The early voting clerk shall post notice of the delivery of materials under this section that is to be made before the time for opening the polls on election day. The notice shall be posted at the main early voting polling place continuously for at least 24 hours immediately preceding the delivery.

(c) At least 24 hours before the delivery, the early voting clerk shall notify the county chair of each political party having a nominee on the ballot of the time the delivery is to be made.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.15; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 80, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 87.0241. PROCESSING BALLOTS BEFORE POLLS OPEN. (a) The early voting ballot board shall make its determination whether to accept early voting ballots voted by mail in accordance with Section 87.041 after the ballots are delivered to the board.

(b) The board may not count early voting ballots until:

(1) the polls open on election day; or

(2) in an election conducted by an authority of a county with a population of 100,000 or more, or conducted jointly with such a county or conducted with such a county through a contract for election services, the end of the period for early voting by personal appearance.

(c) The secretary of state shall prescribe any procedures necessary for implementing this section.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.23. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 39, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 63, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1167 (S.B. 1599), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 87.025. DELIVERING SECOND BALLOT BOX KEY TO BOARD. On request of the presiding officer of the early voting ballot board, the custodian of the key to the second lock on the early voting ballot boxes shall deliver the custodian's key for each box to the presiding officer.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.15; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 81, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 87.026. BYSTANDERS EXCLUDED. (a) Except as permitted by this code and as described by Subsection (b), a person may not be in the meeting place of an early voting ballot board during the time of the board's operations.

(b) Under this code, a person may be lawfully present in the meeting place of an early voting ballot board during the time of the board's operations if the person is:

(1) a presiding judge or member of the board;

(2) a watcher;

(3) a state inspector;

(4) a voting system technician, as authorized by Section 125.010;

(5) the county election officer, as defined by Section 31.091, as necessary to perform tasks related to the administration of the election; or

(6) a person whose presence has been authorized by the presiding judge in accordance with this code.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 33, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.15; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 454 (H.B. 1128), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 87.027. SIGNATURE VERIFICATION COMMITTEE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (a-1), a signature verification committee may be appointed in any election. The early voting clerk is the authority responsible for determining whether a signature verification committee is to be appointed. If the clerk determines that a committee is to be appointed, the clerk shall issue a written order calling for the appointment.

(a-1) A signature verification committee shall be appointed in the general election for state and county officers on submission to the early voting clerk of a written request for the committee by at least 15 registered voters of the county. The request must be submitted not later than the preceding October 1, and a request submitted by mail is considered to be submitted at the time of its receipt by the clerk.

(b) The following authority is responsible for appointing the members of a signature verification committee:

(1) the county election board, in an election for which the board is established;

(2) the county chair, in a primary election; and

(3) the governing body of the political subdivision, in an election ordered by an authority of a political subdivision other than a county.

(c) Not later than the fifth day after the date the early voting clerk issues the order calling for the appointment of a signature verification committee, or not later than October 15 for a committee required under Subsection (a-1), the appropriate authority shall appoint the members of the committee and designate one of the appointees as chair, subject to Subsection (d). The authority shall fill a vacancy on the committee by appointment as soon as possible after the vacancy occurs, subject to Subsection (d). The early voting clerk shall post notice of the name and residence address of each appointee. The notice must remain posted continuously for the period beginning the day after the date of the appointment and ending on the last day of the committee's operation in the election.

(d) The early voting clerk shall determine the number of members who are to compose the signature verification committee and shall state that number in the order calling for the committee's appointment. A committee must consist of not fewer than five members. In an election in which party alignment is indicated on the ballot, each county chair of a political party with a nominee or aligned candidate on the ballot shall submit to the appointing authority a list of names of persons eligible to serve on the signature verification committee in order of the county chair's preference. The authority shall appoint at least two persons from each list in the order of preference indicated on each list to serve as members of the committee. The same number of members must be appointed from each list. The authority shall appoint as chair of the committee the highest-ranked person on the list provided by the political party whose nominee for governor received the most votes in the county in the most recent gubernatorial general election. The authority shall appoint as vice chair of the committee the highest-ranked person on the list provided by the political party whose nominee for governor received the second most votes in the county in the most recent gubernatorial general election. A vacancy on the committee shall be filled by appointment from the original list or from a new list submitted by the appropriate county chair.

(e) To be eligible to serve on a signature verification committee, a person must be eligible under Subchapter C, Chapter 32, for service as a presiding election judge, except that the person must be a qualified voter:

(1) of the county, in a countywide election ordered by the governor or a county authority or in a primary election;

(2) of the part of the county in which the election is held, for an election ordered by the governor or a county authority that does not cover the entire county of the person's residence; or

(3) of the political subdivision, in an election ordered by an authority of a political subdivision other than a county.

(f) The early voting clerk shall determine the place, day or days, and hours of operation of the signature verification committee and shall state that information in the order calling for the committee's appointment. A committee may not begin operating before the 20th day before election day.

(g) The early voting clerk shall post a copy of the order calling for the appointment of the signature verification committee. The copy must remain posted continuously for at least 10 days before the first day the committee meets.

(h) If a signature verification committee is appointed for the election, the early voting clerk shall deliver the jacket envelopes containing the early voting ballots voted by mail to the committee instead of to the early voting ballot board. Deliveries may be made only during the period of the committee's operation at times scheduled in advance of delivery by the early voting clerk. The clerk shall post notice of the time of each delivery. The notice must remain posted continuously for at least two days before the date of the delivery.

(i) The signature verification committee shall compare the signature on each carrier envelope certificate, except those signed for a voter by a witness, with the signature on the voter's ballot application to determine whether the signatures are those of the voter. The committee may also compare the signatures with any known signature of the voter on file with the county clerk or voter registrar to determine whether the signatures are those of the voter. Except as provided by Subsection (l), a determination under this subsection that the signatures are not those of the voter must be made by a majority vote of the committee's membership. The committee shall place the jacket envelopes, carrier envelopes, and applications of voters whose signatures are not those of the voter in separate containers from those of voters whose signatures are those of the voter. The committee chair shall deliver the sorted materials to the early voting ballot board at the time specified by the board's presiding judge.

(j) If a signature verification committee is appointed, the early voting ballot board shall follow the same procedure for accepting the early voting ballots voted by mail as in an election without a signature verification committee, except that the board may not determine whether a voter's signatures on the carrier envelope certificate and ballot application are those of the same person if the committee has determined that the signatures are those of the same person. If the committee has determined that the signatures are not those of the same person, the board may make a determination that the signatures are those of the same person by a majority vote of the board's membership.

(k) Postings required by this section shall be made on the bulletin board used for posting notice of meetings of the commissioners court of a county that does not maintain an Internet website, in an election for which the county election board is established or a primary election, or of the governing body of the political subdivision in other elections.

(k-1) If the county maintains an Internet website, postings required by this section shall be made on the county's Internet website in an election for which the county election board is established or a primary election.

(l) If more than 12 members are appointed to serve on the signature verification committee, the early voting clerk may designate two or more subcommittees of not less than six members. If subcommittees have been designated, a determination under Subsection (i) is made by a majority of the subcommittee.

(m) If ballot materials or ballot applications are recorded electronically as provided by Section 87.126, the signature verification committee may use an electronic copy of a carrier envelope certificate or the voter's ballot application in making the comparison under Subsection (i).

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 33, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.24; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 82, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 88 (S.B. 895), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1164 (H.B. 2817), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 5), Sec. 14, eff. December 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1052 (H.B. 933), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 5.11, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 87.0271. OPPORTUNITY TO CORRECT DEFECT: SIGNATURE VERIFICATION COMMITTEE. (a) This section applies to an early voting ballot voted by mail:

(1) for which the voter did not sign the carrier envelope certificate;

(2) for which it cannot immediately be determined whether the signature on the carrier envelope certificate is that of the voter;

(3) missing any required statement of residence;

(4) missing information or containing incorrect information required under Section 84.002(a)(1-a) or Section 86.002; or

(5) containing incomplete information with respect to a witness.

(b) Not later than the second day after a signature verification committee discovers a defect described by Subsection (a) and before the committee decides whether to accept or reject a timely delivered ballot under Section 87.027, the committee shall send the voter a notice of the defect and a corrective action form developed by the secretary of state under Subsection (c-1) by mail or by common or contract carrier.

(b-1) The signature verification committee shall include with the notice delivered to the voter under Subsection (b):

(1) a brief explanation of each defect in the noncomplying ballot; and

(2) a notice that the voter may:

(A) cancel the voter's application to vote by mail in the manner described by Section 84.032; or

(B) correct the defect in the voter's ballot by:

(i) submitting a corrective action form developed and made available by the secretary of state under Subsection (c-1) by mail or by common or contract carrier; or

(ii) coming to the early voting clerk's office not later than the sixth day after election day.

(c) If the signature verification committee determines that it would not be possible for the voter to receive the notice of defect within a reasonable time to correct the defect, the committee may notify the voter of the defect by telephone or e-mail and inform the voter that the voter may request to have the voter's application to vote by mail canceled in the manner described by Section 84.032, submit a corrective action form developed by the secretary of state under Subsection (c-1) by mail or by common or contract carrier, or come to the early voting clerk's office in person not later than the sixth day after election day to correct the defect.

(c-1) The secretary of state shall develop a corrective action form that may be completed and submitted to a signature verification committee under this section to correct a defect.

(d) If the signature verification committee takes an action described by Subsection (b) or (c), the committee must take either action described by that subsection with respect to each ballot in the election to which this section applies.

(e) A poll watcher is entitled to observe an action taken under Subsection (b) or (c).

(e-1) The committee shall:

(1) in addition to sending the voter a notice of the defect under Subsection (b) or notifying the voter of the defect by telephone or e-mail under Subsection (c), notify the voter of a defect discovered under this section using the online tool described by Section 86.015; and

(2) if possible, permit the voter to correct a defect using the online tool described by Section 86.015.

(f) The secretary of state may prescribe any procedures necessary to implement this section.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, a ballot may not be finally rejected for a reason listed in Section 87.041(b)(1), (2), or (6) before the seventh day after election day.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 5.12, eff. December 2, 2021.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1167 (S.B. 1599), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 87.0272. TRAINING. The secretary of state shall provide a standardized training program and materials for members of a signature verification committee in the same manner it provides such a program under Subchapter F, Chapter 32.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 415 (H.B. 1632), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 87.028. ACCESS TO INFORMATION. (a) On request, a county election official shall provide to a member of an early voting ballot board all available information necessary to fulfilling the functions of the board, including any information from the statewide computerized voter registration list under Section 18.061.

(b) On request, a county election official shall provide to a member of a signature verification committee all available information necessary to fulfilling the functions of the committee, including any information from the statewide computerized voter registration list under Section 18.061.

(c) The secretary of state shall adopt rules as necessary to prevent a member of an early voting ballot board or signature verification committee from retaining or sharing personally identifiable information from the statewide computerized voter registration list under Section 18.061 obtained under this section for any reason unrelated to the official's official duties.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 2.09, eff. December 2, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER C. ACCEPTING EARLY VOTING BALLOT VOTED BY MAIL

Sec. 87.041. ACCEPTING VOTER. (a) The early voting ballot board shall open each jacket envelope for an early voting ballot voted by mail and determine whether to accept the voter's ballot.

(b) A ballot may be accepted only if:

(1) the carrier envelope certificate is properly executed;

(2) neither the voter's signature on the ballot application nor the signature on the carrier envelope certificate is determined to have been executed by a person other than the voter, unless signed by a witness;

(3) the voter's ballot application states a legal ground for early voting by mail;

(4) the voter is registered to vote, if registration is required by law;

(5) the address to which the ballot was mailed to the voter, as indicated by the application, was outside the voter's county of residence, if the ground for early voting is absence from the county of residence;

(6) for a voter to whom a statement of residence form was required to be sent under Section 86.002(a), the statement of residence is returned in the carrier envelope and indicates that the voter satisfies the residence requirements prescribed by Section 63.0011;

(7) the address to which the ballot was mailed to the voter is an address that is otherwise required by Sections 84.002 and 86.003; and

(8) the information required under Section 86.002(g) provided by the voter identifies the same voter identified on the voter's application for voter registration under Section 13.002(c)(8).

(c) If a ballot is accepted, the board shall enter the voter's name on the poll list unless the form of the list makes it impracticable to do so. The names of the voters casting ballots by mail shall be listed separately on the poll list from those casting ballots by personal appearance.

(d) A ballot shall be rejected if any requirement prescribed by Subsection (b) is not satisfied. In that case, the board shall indicate the rejection by entering "rejected" on the carrier envelope and on the corresponding jacket envelope.

(d-1) If a voter provides the information required under Section 86.002(g) and it identifies the same voter identified on the voter's application for voter registration under Section 13.002(c)(8), the signature on the ballot application and on the carrier envelope certificate shall be rebuttably presumed to be the signatures of the voter. The board shall compare signatures in making a determination under Subsection (b)(2) regardless of whether the presumption provided by this subsection exists.

(e) In making the determination under Subsection (b)(2), to determine whether the signatures are those of the voter, the board may also compare the signatures with any known signature of the voter on file with the county clerk or voter registrar.

(f) In making the determination under Subsection (b)(2) for a ballot cast under Chapter 101 or 105, the board shall compare the signature on the carrier envelope or signature cover sheet with the signature of the voter on the federal postcard application.

(g) A person commits an offense if the person intentionally accepts a ballot for voting or causes a ballot to be accepted for voting that the person knows does not meet the requirements of Subsection (b). An offense under this subsection is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 34, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.25; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 42, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1107 (H.B. 2309), Sec. 1.19, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1318 (S.B. 100), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 681 (H.B. 2233), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 5), Sec. 15, eff. December 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 5.13, eff. December 2, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1167 (S.B. 1599), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 87.0411. OPPORTUNITY TO CORRECT DEFECT: EARLY VOTING BALLOT BOARD. (a) This section applies to an early voting ballot voted by mail:

(1) for which the voter did not sign the carrier envelope certificate;

(2) for which it cannot immediately be determined whether the signature on the carrier envelope certificate is that of the voter;

(3) missing any required statement of residence;

(4) missing information or containing incorrect information required under Section 84.002(a)(1-a) or Section 86.002; or

(5) containing incomplete information with respect to a witness.

(b) Not later than the second day after an early voting ballot board discovers a defect described by Subsection (a) and before the board decides whether to accept or reject a timely delivered ballot under Section 87.041, the board shall send the voter a notice of the defect and a corrective action form developed by the secretary of state under Subsection (c-1) by mail or by common or contract carrier.

(b-1) The early voting ballot board shall include with the notice delivered to the voter under Subsection (b):

(1) a brief explanation of each defect in the noncomplying ballot; and

(2) a notice that the voter may:

(A) cancel the voter's application to vote by mail in the manner described by Section 84.032; or

(B) correct the defect in the voter's ballot by:

(i) submitting a corrective action form developed and made available by the secretary of state under Subsection (c-1) by mail or by common or contract carrier; or

(ii) coming to the early voting clerk's office not later than the sixth day after election day.

(c) If the early voting ballot board determines that it would not be possible for the voter to receive the notice of defect within a reasonable time to correct the defect, the board may notify the voter of the defect by telephone or e-mail and inform the voter that the voter may request to have the voter's application to vote by mail canceled in the manner described by Section 84.032, submit a corrective action form developed by the secretary of state under Subsection (c-1) by mail or by common or contract carrier, or come to the early voting clerk's office in person not later than the sixth day after election day to correct the defect.

(c-1) The secretary of state shall develop a corrective action form that may be completed and submitted to an early voting ballot board under this section to correct a defect.

(d) If the early voting ballot board takes an action described by Subsection (b) or (c), the board must take either action described by that subsection with respect to each ballot in the election to which this section applies.

(e) A poll watcher is entitled to observe an action taken under Subsection (b) or (c).

(e-1) The early voting ballot board shall:

(1) in addition to sending the voter notice of the defect under Subsection (b) or notifying the voter of the defect by telephone or e-mail under Subsection (c), notify the voter of a defect discovered under this section using the online tool described by Section 86.015; and

(2) if possible, permit the voter to correct a defect using the online tool described by Section 86.015.

(f) The secretary of state may prescribe any procedures necessary to implement this section.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, a ballot may not be finally rejected for a reason listed in Section 87.041(b)(1), (2), or (6) before the seventh day after election day.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 5.14, eff. December 2, 2021.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1167 (S.B. 1599), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 87.042. DISPOSITION OF ACCEPTED BALLOT. (a) The early voting ballot board shall open each carrier envelope containing an accepted ballot without defacing the certificate on the carrier envelope and remove the ballot envelope from the carrier envelope.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), the board shall place the ballot envelope containing an accepted ballot in the ballot box containing the early voting ballots voted by personal appearance.

(c) The ballot envelope must be placed in a separate container if:

(1) the ballots are to be counted at a central counting station; or

(2) the procedure for counting the early voting votes cast by personal appearance is different from that for counting the votes cast by mail.

(d) An accepted ballot that was not returned in the official ballot envelope shall be treated as an accepted ballot that was returned in the ballot envelope.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.17; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1107 (H.B. 2309), Sec. 1.20, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 87.043. DISPOSITION OF REJECTED BALLOT. (a) The early voting ballot board shall place the carrier envelopes containing rejected ballots in an envelope and shall seal the envelope. More than one envelope may be used if necessary. The board shall keep a record of the number of rejected ballots in each envelope.

(b) The envelope for the rejected ballots must indicate the date and identity of the election and must be labeled "rejected early voting ballots" and signed by the board's presiding judge.

(c) A board member shall deliver the envelope containing the rejected ballots to the general custodian of election records to be preserved for the period for preserving the precinct election records. The envelope may not be placed in the box containing the voted ballots.

(d) A notation must be made on the carrier envelope of any ballot that was rejected after the carrier envelope was opened and include the reason the envelope was opened and the ballot was rejected.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 8(c), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.17; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1318 (S.B. 100), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 87.0431. NOTICE OF REJECTED BALLOT. (a) Not later than the 10th day after election day, the presiding judge of the early voting ballot board shall deliver written notice of the reason for the rejection of a ballot to the voter at the residence address on the ballot application. If the ballot was transmitted to the voter by e-mail under Subchapter C, Chapter 101, the presiding judge shall also provide the notice to the e-mail address to which the ballot was sent.

(b) The early voting clerk shall, not later than the 30th day after election day, deliver notice to the attorney general, including certified copies of the carrier envelope and corresponding ballot application, of any ballot rejected because:

(1) the voter was deceased;

(2) the voter already voted in person in the same election;

(3) the signatures on the carrier envelope and ballot application were not executed by the same person;

(4) the carrier envelope certificate lacked a witness signature;

(5) the carrier envelope certificate was improperly executed by an assistant; or

(6) the early voting ballot board or the signature verification committee determined that another violation of the Election Code occurred.

(c) The attorney general shall prescribe the form and manner of submission under Subsection (b). The secretary of state shall adopt rules as necessary to implement the requirements prescribed under this subsection.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.26, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1318 (S.B. 100), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 5), Sec. 16, eff. December 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 5.15, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 87.044. DISPOSITION OF APPLICATION. (a) The early voting ballot board shall place each application for a ballot voted by mail in its corresponding jacket envelope. For a ballot voted under Chapter 101 or 105, the board shall also place the copy of the voter's federal postcard application or signature cover sheet in the same location as the carrier envelope. If the voter's ballot was accepted, the board shall also place the carrier envelope in the jacket envelope. However, if the jacket envelope is to be used in a subsequent election, the carrier envelope shall be retained elsewhere.

(b) A board member shall deliver the jacket envelope, carrier envelope, and application in a container other than that used for the voted ballots to the general custodian of election records, to be retained for the period for preserving the precinct election records.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 8(d), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.17; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1318 (S.B. 100), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER D. PROCESSING MANUALLY COUNTED BALLOTS

Sec. 87.061. AUTHORITY RESPONSIBLE FOR COUNTING BALLOTS. The early voting ballot board shall count the early voting ballots that are to be counted manually.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.18; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 87.062. COUNTING BALLOTS AND PREPARING RETURNS. (a) On the direction of the presiding judge, the early voting ballot board, in accordance with Section 85.032(b), shall open the containers for the early voting ballots that are to be counted by the board, remove the contents from each container, and remove any ballots enclosed in ballot envelopes from their envelopes.

(b) The board shall count the ballots and prepare the returns in accordance with the procedure applicable to paper ballots cast at a precinct polling place.

(c) Ballots voted by mail shall be tabulated and stored separately from the ballots voted by personal appearance and shall be separately reported on the returns.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 562, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.18; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 5.16, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 87.063. DISPOSITION OF BALLOTS AND OTHER ITEMS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the presiding judge of the early voting ballot board shall deliver the early voting ballots counted by the board, early voting election returns, other early voting election records, and ballot box keys, to the appropriate authorities in accordance with the procedures applicable to distribution of corresponding items from a precinct polling place using paper ballots.

(b) If part of the early voting ballots are counted by automatic tabulating equipment at a central counting station, instead of delivering a copy of the early voting election returns and other early voting election records to the canvassing authority and to the general custodian of election records, those records shall be delivered to the presiding judge of the central counting station.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.18; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

SUBCHAPTER F. PROCESSING BALLOTS COUNTED AT CENTRAL COUNTING STATION

Sec. 87.101. DELIVERY OF BALLOTS TO COUNTING STATION. On the direction of the presiding judge, the early voting ballot board shall deliver to the central counting station the container for the early voting electronic system ballots that are to be counted by automatic tabulating equipment at a central counting station. The board shall make the delivery without opening the container and in accordance with the procedure applicable to electronic system ballots cast at a precinct polling place.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 562, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.20; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 28, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 87.102. DUPLICATING PAPER BALLOTS FOR AUTOMATIC COUNTING. (a) The authority adopting an electronic voting system in which ballots are counted at a central counting station may direct by resolution, order, or other official action that the early voting regular paper ballots cast in an election be duplicated as electronic system ballots for automatic counting at the central counting station.

(b) Early voting ballots that are to be duplicated under this section shall be delivered to the central counting station as prescribed by Section 87.101 and shall be treated in the same manner as damaged electronic system ballots that are duplicated for automatic counting.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.20; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 87.103. COUNTING BALLOTS AND PREPARING RETURNS. (a) The early voting electronic system ballots counted at a central counting station, the ballots cast at precinct polling places, and the ballots voted by mail shall be tabulated separately and shall be separately reported on the returns.

(b) The early voting returns prepared at the central counting station must include any early voting results obtained by the early voting ballot board under Subchapter D.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.20; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 5.17, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 87.104. DISPOSITION OF EARLY VOTING BALLOT BOARD RETURNS AND OTHER RECORDS. Early voting returns or other early voting election records to be delivered to the central counting station under Section 87.063(b) or 87.084(b) shall be delivered to the appropriate authorities with the counting station records.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.20; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

SUBCHAPTER G. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 87.121. EARLY VOTING ROSTERS. (a) The early voting clerk shall maintain for each election a roster listing each person who votes an early voting ballot by personal appearance and a roster listing each person to whom an early voting ballot to be voted by mail is sent.

(b) For each person listed, the applicable roster must include:

(1) the person's name, address, and voter registration number;

(2) an identification of the person's county election precinct of registration; and

(3) the date of voting or the date the ballot was mailed to the person, as applicable.

(c) Each roster shall be updated daily.

(d) Each roster may be maintained in any form approved by the secretary of state.

(e) The clerk shall preserve each roster after the election for the period for preserving the precinct election records.

(f) Information on the roster for a person to whom an early voting mail ballot has been sent is not available for public inspection, except to the voter seeking to verify that the information pertaining to the voter is accurate, until the first business day after election day.

(g) Information on the roster for a person who votes an early voting ballot by personal appearance shall be made available for public inspection as provided by Subsection (i) not later than 11 a.m. on the day after the date the information is entered on the roster under Subsection (c).

(h) Information on the roster for a person who votes an early voting ballot by mail shall be made available for public inspection as provided by Subsection (i) not later than 11 a.m. on the day following the day the early voting clerk receives any ballot voted by mail.

(i) The information under Subsections (g) and (h) must be made available:

(1) for an election in which the county clerk is the early voting clerk:

(A) on the publicly accessible Internet website of the county; or

(B) if the county does not maintain a website, on the bulletin board used for posting notice of meetings of the commissioners court; or

(2) for an election not described by Subdivision (1):

(A) on the publicly accessible Internet website of the authority ordering the election; or

(B) if the authority ordering the election does not maintain a website, on the bulletin board used for posting notice of meetings of the governing body of the authority.

(j) The early voting clerk for a primary election or the general election for state and county officers shall submit to the secretary of state for posting on the secretary of state's Internet website the information described by:

(1) Subsection (g) not later than 11 a.m. on the day after the date the information is entered on the roster under Subsection (c); and

(2) Subsection (h) not later than 11 a.m. on the day following the day the early voting clerk receives any ballot voted by mail.

(k) The early voting clerk for a primary election or the general election for state and county officers shall submit to the secretary of state for posting on the secretary of state's Internet website the election day information described by Subsections (g) and (h) not later than 11 a.m. on the day after the election.

(l) The early voting clerk for a primary election or the general election for state and county officers shall submit to the secretary of state for posting on the secretary of state's Internet website the final rosters containing information described by Subsections (g) and (h) not later than the 20th day after the date of the local canvass.

(m) The secretary of state shall post the information described by Subsection (j) on the secretary of state's Internet website in a downloadable format not later than 11 a.m. on the day following the day of receipt of the information.

(n) The secretary of state shall create a system for an early voting clerk for a primary election or the general election for state and county officers to provide the information to the secretary of state for posting on the secretary of state's Internet website under Subsection (j).

(o) A person registered to vote in the county where the early voting clerk is conducting early voting may submit a complaint to the secretary of state stating that an early voting clerk has not complied with this section.

(p) The secretary of state by rule shall create and maintain a system for receiving and recording complaints made under this section.

(q) The secretary of state shall maintain a record indicating early voting clerks who have failed to comply with the requirements of this section.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.28; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 565, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 83, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 958, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 393, Sec. 17, 18, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (H.B. 1850), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1215 (S.B. 902), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Reenacted and amended by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 66 (H.B. 1622), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Reenacted and amended by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 317 (H.B. 1382), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Reenacted and amended by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 7.002, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 87.122. PRECINCT EARLY VOTING LIST. (a) For each election precinct in the territory served by the early voting clerk, the clerk shall prepare a list containing the name, address, and voter registration number of each person registered in the precinct who votes an early voting ballot by personal appearance and to whom an early voting ballot to be voted by mail is sent.

(b) If an election precinct is situated in more than one county election precinct, the list must indicate each voter's county election precinct of residence.

(c) The clerk shall enter "early voting voter" beside the name of each person on the precinct list of registered voters whose name appears on the list of early voting voters and shall deliver the precinct list to the presiding judge of the election precinct not later than the day before election day.

(d) The clerk shall preserve a copy of each precinct early voting list prepared for the general election for state and county officers for two years after election day.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.21; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 560 (H.B. 2366), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 87.1221. DISPOSITION OF BALLOT TRANSMITTAL FORM. (a) The presiding judge of the early voting ballot board shall enter on the ballot transmittal form the following information:

(1) the number of personal appearance ballots received;

(2) the number of mail ballots received;

(3) the number of mail ballots accepted;

(4) the number of mail ballots rejected; and

(5) the number of ballots counted or delivered to the central counting station, as applicable.

(b) A board member shall deliver the transmittal form to the general custodian of election records to be preserved for the period for preserving the precinct election records.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.29.

Sec. 87.123. DELIVERING OTHER RECORDS AND SUPPLIES. Not later than the second day after election day, the early voting clerk shall deliver:

(1) the early voting records and supplies, other than those required to be delivered to the early voting ballot board, to the authority to whom the corresponding precinct election records are delivered after the election; and

(2) the applications for early voting ballots voted by personal appearance to the general custodian of election records, to be retained for the period for preserving the precinct election records.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.21; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 87.1231. EARLY VOTING VOTES REPORTED BY PRECINCT. Not later than the time of the local canvass, the early voting clerk shall deliver to the local canvassing authority a report of the total number of early voting votes for each candidate or measure by election precinct. The report may reflect the total for votes by mail and the total for votes by personal appearance.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 114, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.30; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 40, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 29, 44, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 87.124. PRESERVATION OF EARLY VOTING ELECTION RECORDS GENERALLY. The early voting election returns, voted early voting ballots, and other early voting election records shall be preserved after the election in the same manner as the corresponding precinct election records.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.21; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 87.125. COUNTING OF CERTAIN LATE BALLOTS VOTED BY MAIL. (a) The early voting ballot board shall convene to count ballots voted by mail described by Section 86.007(d) at the time set by the presiding judge of the board on the ninth day after the date of an election or on an earlier day if the early voting clerk certifies that all ballots mailed from outside the United States have been received.

(a-1) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), for an election held on the date of the general election for state and county officers, the early voting ballot board shall convene to count ballots voted by mail described by Sections 86.007(d) and (d-1) not later than the 13th day after the date of the election.

(b) On counting the ballots under Subsection (a), the early voting ballot board shall report the results to the local canvassing authority for the election.

(c) If the date prescribed by Subsection (a) for convening the early voting ballot board is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal state or national holiday, the early voting ballot board shall convene on the next regular business day.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 41, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 30, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 1, Sec. 5, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1062 (H.B. 1414), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 84 (S.B. 1703), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 818 (H.B. 1151), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 87.126. ELECTRONIC RECORDING OF BALLOT MATERIALS AND APPLICATIONS. (a) The early voting clerk may electronically record applications for a ballot to be voted by mail, jacket envelopes, carrier envelopes, and ballots.

(a-1) Electronic records made under this section shall record both sides of any application, envelope, or ballot recorded, and all such records shall be provided to the early voting ballot board, the signature verification committee, or both.

(b) The secretary of state may adopt rules providing requirements for the electronic image quality and storage of the electronic images of the documents described by Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1164 (H.B. 2817), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 5.18, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 87.127. RESOLUTION OF INCORRECT DETERMINATION BY EARLY VOTING BALLOT BOARD. (a) If a county election officer, as defined by Section 31.091, determines a ballot was incorrectly rejected or accepted by the early voting ballot board before the time set for convening the canvassing authority, the county election officer may petition a district court for injunctive or other relief as the court determines appropriate.

(b) In an election ordered by the governor or by a county judge, the county election officer must confer with and establish the agreement of the county chair of each political party before petitioning the district court.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 87.128. NOTES. (a) Each member of an early voting ballot board and each member of a signature verification committee is entitled to take any notes reasonably necessary to perform the member's duties under this chapter.

(b) Notes taken under this section may not contain personally identifiable information.

(c) Each member who takes notes under this section shall sign the notes and deliver them to the presiding judge or committee chair, as applicable, for delivery to the custodian of election records.

(d) Notes collected under this section shall be preserved in the same manner as precinct election records under Section 66.058.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 5.19, eff. December 2, 2021.